Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 9 Establishment of Private Roads
§ 24-9-101.
Answer and complaint; initial hearing; appointment of viewers and appraisers.

Any person whose land has no outlet to, nor connection with a public road, may commence an action in district court in any county in which any part of the land is located for a private road leading from his land to some convenient public road. The plaintiff shall join as defendants the owners of record, owners of recorded easements and rights of way and any lessee, mortgagee or occupant of the land over which any proposed road would cross. The complaint shall contain a short and plain statement of:

The legal description of the land owned by the plaintiff to which access is sought and a statement that all or some of the land is located within the county;

A specific statement as to why the land has no legally enforceable access, other than a waterway, and whether the land is surrounded on all sides by land owned by another person or persons or a natural or man-made barrier making access unreasonably costly;

A description of the plaintiff’s efforts to purchase a legally enforceable access to a public road;

A description sufficient to identify the general location of any access routes proposed by the plaintiff;

The legal description of all land over which any proposed access routes would cross; and

A statement as to whether any actions of the plaintiff or any person with the consent and knowledge of the plaintiff, caused the plaintiff’s land to lose or to not have any legally enforceable access.

The defendant’s answer shall set forth the location and description, in the manner described in paragraphs (a)(iv) and (v) of this section, of any alternate routes proposed by the defendant and the owners of record, owners of recorded easements and rights of way and any lessee, mortgagee or occupant of the land over which any proposed alternate routes would cross.

The court shall give an action for a private road precedence over other civil cases pending in court, other than election contests, and the action shall in every way be expedited.

If the plaintiff has had access to his land and that access is being denied or restricted, the court may grant temporary access to the plaintiff over a route identified by the court pending the outcome of the proceedings.

The plaintiff shall join as defendants persons identified under subsection (b) of this section or otherwise identified by a defendant as the owners of record, owners of recorded easements and rights of way and any lessee, mortgagee or occupant of the land over which any proposed alternative routes would cross.

The court may require the plaintiff to file a bond to pay for costs allowed under W.S.

24-9-103

.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 99, § 3.

The court shall hold an initial hearing to determine whether the plaintiff has satisfied the requirements of this section and access is necessary because the plaintiff has no legally enforceable access. If the court finds the requirements of this section have been met and access is necessary, the court shall appoint three (3) disinterested persons as viewers and appraisers. Before entering upon their duties the viewers shall take and subscribe to an oath that they will faithfully and impartially perform their duties under their appointment as viewers and appraisers. The court shall direct them to meet on a day named in the order on the proposed road, and view and appraise any damages, at which time and place all persons interested may appear and be heard by the viewers. The viewers and appraisers shall then proceed to locate and mark out a private road and alternative routes as they deem appropriate, provided the location of the road shall not be marked out to cross the lands of any person not joined in the action. The viewers and appraisers shall recommend to the court the most reasonable and convenient route, provided that access shall be along section and boundary lines whenever practical. The viewers and appraisers may recommend specific conditions that the court place on the road, including provisions for maintenance and limitations on the amount and type of use. The proposed road shall not exceed thirty (30) feet in width from a certain point on the land of the plaintiff to some certain point on the public road, and shall be located so as to do the least possible damage to the lands through which the private road is located. The viewers and appraisers shall also appraise any damages sustained by the owner over which the road is to be established and make full and true returns, with a plat of the road to the court. The viewers and appraisers shall also determine whether or not any gates or cattleguards should be placed at proper points on the road, and appraise any damages in accordance with that determination.

In determining any damages to be suffered by a defendant, the viewers and appraisers shall appraise the value of the property affected by the road before and after the road is in place. Damages also may include reasonable compensation for any improvements on the lands over which any private road is to be granted which were not paid for and will be used by the plaintiff.

and (m) Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 99, § 3.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 28; R.S. 1899, § 1933; Laws 1901, ch. 11, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 2540; C.S. 1920, § 3012; R.S. 1931, § 52-231; C.S. 1945, § 48-331; W.S. 1957, § 24-92; Laws 1985, ch. 56, § 1; 2000, ch. 88, § 1; 2003, ch. 9, § 1; 2008, ch. 58, § 1; 2009, ch. 188, § 1; 2011, ch. 46, § 1; 2013 ch. 99, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to oaths, see chapter 2 of title 1.

As to publication of notices, see §

1-6-201

et seq.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (m).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (h), divided the former first sentence into the present first and third sentences by adding “within thirty (30) days of the completion of the hearing enter its order so finding and certify the application directly to the district court unless the board elects to retain jurisdiction” at the end of the first sentence and redesignating the language beginning “The board shall appoint” as the third sentence, and added the present second sentence; inserted “conducted by the board of county commissioners” in the first sentence of (k), and rewrote (m) which read: “If at the completion of the hearing the board finds that the applicant has satisfied the requirements of this section and access is necessary because the applicant has no legally enforceable access, the board shall, within twenty (20) days of so finding, certify the application directly to the district court unless the board elects to retain jurisdiction. Notice of the board's certification shall be made in writing to the clerk of the district court and to all affected parties having an interest in the lands through which the proposed road or any alternative road may pass. The district court shall treat the certified application as a newly filed civil action upon payment of a filing fee by the applicant as provided in W.S. 5-3-206(a)(i).”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), added the last sentence; in (c), substituted “eighty-five (85)” for “thirty (30),” and “not sooner than one hundred forty-five (145) days after the filing of the application with the board” for “at a date that allows the applicant time to give all notice required under this section”; and in (e), inserted “all landowners affected by any alternative routes proposed as provided in subsection (b) of this section,” deleted “or the viewers and appraisers” at the end of the first sentence; substituted “forty-five (45)” for “sixty (60)” twice, and inserted “including any landowner affected by any alternative route proposed as provided in subsection (b) of this section.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section, modifying the procedures for establishing private roads.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (

l

) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Generally.—

From the private
road statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 24-9-101(a) (2015), and its cases interpreting that statute, the
Supreme Court of Wyoming draws the following framework to determine
whether a private road applicant has established the necessity of
a private road: (1) does the private road applicant's property have
direct access to a public road or a legally enforceable connection
with or outlet to a public road; (2) does that public road provide
convenient and reasonable access to the applicant's property? If both
questions are answered in the affirmative, the private road applicant
has failed to establish the necessity of the requested private road. Thornock v. Esterholdt, 2016 WY 63, 375 P.3d 750,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2016).

Reasonable and convenient access. —

For purposes
of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 24-9-101(a) (2015), a road running between the landowners' northern
parcel and another parcel they owned provided the landowners with
reasonable and convenient access where the northern parcel adjoined
and had direct access to the road, the fact that their right to use
the road was not a legally enforceable right appurtenant to their
property did not change the adequacy of the access provided, there
was no evidence that obtaining a commercial permit imposed a substantial
burden on the landowners or was obviously impractical and unreasonable,
and the negative effect on their property values of having public
road access to their property rather than legally enforceable access
was irrelevant to the question of necessity under the private road
statute. Thornock v. Esterholdt, 2016 WY 63, 375 P.3d 750,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2016).

Because the district court never decided the question of whether a proposed private road was reasonable or convenient, collateral estoppel and law of the case did not apply; the question of whether the applicants' proposed route was a reasonable one was not previously before the district court because the issues addressed were whether the applicants filed their application in good faith and whether their property was landlocked. Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P'ship, 2017 WY 59, 395 P.3d 653,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2017).

This section offers complete relief to the shut-in landowner

and covers the whole subject matter. Snell v. Ruppert, 541 P.2d 1042,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1975), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991); Acquiring Access to Private Landlocked Tracts: Wyoming's Statutory Right-of-Way, Walton v. Dana, 609 P.2d 461,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1980), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Application properly approved.—

Private road was properly established to provide a landowner with access to their property because the record supported the designation of the route as the most reasonable and convenient route. Furthermore, the district court did not err when it declined to impose proposed use restrictions—to limit use of the road to a single-family dwelling and agricultural purposes and to prohibit the landowner from using it for subdivision—because the evidence supported the court’s finding that the proposed restrictions were inappropriate. Sharpe v. Timchula, 2019 WY 121, 453 P.3d 761,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2019).

Damages.—

Although a private road was properly established to provide a landowner with access to their property, the district court erred in its award of damages because damages were not calculated in accordance with the statutory requirements. The court on remand was to instruct the viewers and appraisers to determine and separately report the before and after values of each separately owned parcel of affected land and to explain the factors that affected each reported before and after value. Sharpe v. Timchula, 2019 WY 121, 453 P.3d 761,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2019).

And pursuit of additional remedy not required. —

This section does not require that petitioner seek other relief prior to filing petition for a private road. Miller v. Bradley, 4 P.3d 882,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2000).

It has its roots in art. 1, §§ 32 and 33, Wyo. Const.

Snell v. Ruppert, 541 P.2d 1042,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1975), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Good faith. —

Good faith in bringing an application to the board of county commissioners for establishment of a private road is an essential prerequisite. Mayland v. Flitner, 2001 WY 69, 28 P.3d 838,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2001).

Section not nullified if susceptible of sensible construction. —

This section must be given a sensible construction and the court will not nullify its operation if the section is susceptible of another interpretation. Acquiring Access to Private Landlocked Tracts: Wyoming's Statutory Right-of-Way, Walton v. Dana, 609 P.2d 461,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1980), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Land-locked landowner is not confined to the common-law remedy of forcing a way of necessity

across the lots, having a common origin of unity of title with his, but he has available to him the right to take a private road across the lands of a stranger to his title. Snell v. Ruppert, 541 P.2d 1042,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1975), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

And bringing of common-law action not condition precedent to invoking section. —

It is not a condition precedent to proceeding under this section that a landlocked owner must first proceed to enforce and proceed under any common-law way of necessity he may have. Acquiring Access to Private Landlocked Tracts: Wyoming's Statutory Right-of-Way, Walton v. Dana, 609 P.2d 461,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1980), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

For section abrogates common law. —

This section, which provides that any person whose land has no outlet to, nor connection with, a public road, may make application for a private road, abrogates the common law, under which there is present the implied consent of the owner that his grantee has an outlet from the property he has conveyed and payment of compensation for the way of necessity is not anticipated. Snell v. Ruppert, 541 P.2d 1042,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1975), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

This state no longer recognizes the common-law easement by necessity in cases involving landlocked estates. Leo Sheep Co. v. United States, 440 U.S. 668, 99 S. Ct. 1403, 59 L. Ed. 2d 677, 1979 U.S. LEXIS 81 (U.S. 1979).

Although pursuit of additional remedy not barred. —

Where an appellant pursues some remedy under this section and does not seek redress by way of appeal from an unfavorable determination of that action, he is not precluded from pursuing another remedy under §

1-26-401

(now repealed). Coronado Oil Co. v. Grieves, 603 P.2d 406,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 490

(Wyo. 1979).

Choice to pursue right rests exclusively with petitioners. —

Whether to pursue their right to claim a common-law way of necessity or proceed for establishment of a private road over the lands of a stranger is a choice which rests exclusively with the petitioners. Acquiring Access to Private Landlocked Tracts: Wyoming's Statutory Right-of-Way, Walton v. Dana, 609 P.2d 461,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1980), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Common-law way of necessity unconstitutional. —

The concept of a common-law way of necessity is theoretically incompatible with art. I, § 32, Wyo. Const. (eminent domain). Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

And civil action therefor unavailable. —

A civil action for a common law way of necessity is not available because of the existence of this section. Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

This section applies only to condemnations for private purpose.

Dry Creek Lodge, Inc. v. United States, 515 F.2d 926, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 14757 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975), cert. denied, Shoshone Tribes v. Dry Creek Lodge, Inc., 449 U.S. 1118, 101 S. Ct. 931, 66 L. Ed. 2d 847, 1981 U.S. LEXIS 585 (U.S. 1981).

Usefulness. —

This section does not provide a workable procedure for establishing private roads, and thus the supreme court has encouraged the legislature to amend this statute to make it capable of addressing “the complexities associated with development and progress in an essentially rural state.” Dunning v. Ankney, 936 P.2d 61,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1997).

Outlet to and connection with public road. —

Board of county commissioner's decision to establish a private road across private property was not arbitrary, capricious, an abuse of discretion or otherwise not in accordance with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

24-9-101

even though the petitioner had an outlet to, and connection with, a public road. Wagstaff v. Sublette County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 123, 53 P.3d 79,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2002).

Plain meaning of “lead” as used in this section is to “serve to bring a person to a” place. Applying this definition, the statute clearly states that the private road must “serve to bring a person to” a public road; it does not state that the private road has to cover the entire distance from the applicant's land to the public way or terminate at a public road.
J & T Props., LLC v. Gallagher (In re Establishment of a Private Roadway to Real Prop.), 2011 WY 112, 256 P.3d 522,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2011).

“No outlet to, nor connection with public road” means

no legally enforceable, existing outlet to, nor connection with, a public road; but this must be read with the other provisions of the section. Acquiring Access to Private Landlocked Tracts: Wyoming's Statutory Right-of-Way, Walton v. Dana, 609 P.2d 461,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1980), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Substantial
evidence supported a decision to deny an application for a private
road, and the record did not establish the high level of inconvenience
required to show necessity where the evidence showed that the property
had access to a highway and a county road. Both a county road and
a state easement were accessible from roads on a ranch, and they
connected
with convenient public roads and were routinely used for
ranch business
by members of the public, as invitees, using a variety
of vehicles. Price Family Trust v. Hutchinson, 2014 WY 162, 340 P.3d 1002,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2014).

Access to property by means of lease of adjoining property

does not constitute either an “outlet to” or a “connection with” a convenient public road as those terms are used in this section. Reaves v. Riley, 782 P.2d 1136,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1989).

“No outlet to, nor connection with public road” means

no legally enforceable, existing outlet to, nor connection with, a public road; but this must be read with the other provisions of the section. Acquiring Access to Private Landlocked Tracts: Wyoming's Statutory Right-of-Way, Walton v. Dana, 609 P.2d 461,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1980), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Access to property by means of lease of adjoining property

does not constitute either an “outlet to” or a “connection with” a convenient public road as those terms are used in this section. Reaves v. Riley, 782 P.2d 1136,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1989).

“Public road” defined. —

A “public road” is one that the public generally, not merely a portion of the public, is privileged to use. McGuire v. McGuire, 608 P.2d 1278,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1980).

Courts' determination of whether a road is a “public road” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

24-9-101

, is not binding upon the federal government; however, that does not prevent the court from determining whether the road is a public road for the purposes of §

24-9-101

.Reidy v. Stratton Sheep Co., 2006 WY 69, 135 P.3d 598,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2006).

Board of county commissioners'
finding that a ranch road was a public road for purposes of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

24-9-101

et seq., was not supported by substantial evidence where the road's use was limited to employees, former employees, and family members of the ranch and the road was not recognized as a public road by neighboring Native American tribes.
Pine Bar Ranch, LLC v. Luther, 2007 WY 35, 152 P.3d 1062,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2007).

For purposes of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 24-9-101(a) (2015), a road running between the landowners' northern parcel and another parcel they owned was a public road where the BLM and the State considered the road, as it ran between the two parcels, to be a public road, open for use by the public generally rather than merely by a portion of the public, and the fact that commercial use was not allowed on the road did not alter its public character. Thornock v. Esterholdt, 2016 WY 63, 375 P.3d 750,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2016).

What constitutes “necessity.” —

A party having one way whereby he can reach a public highway, and affording him reasonable facilities for enjoying his premises, is not entitled to another way as a way of necessity. McIlquham v. Anthony Wilkinson Live Stock Co., 18 Wyo. 53, 104 P. 20,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1909).

Any person whose land is so situated that it has no outlet, no legally enforceable means by which he can gain access, has demonstrated “necessity,” as a matter of law, without there being a further need to show that he lives on that land or that it is being used for some specific purpose. McGuire v. McGuire, 608 P.2d 1278,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1980). See, also, Gold v. Board of County Comm'rs, 658 P.2d 690,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1983).

Where the evidence shows that petitioners for a private road have no presently existing “outlet to, nor connection with a public road,” a common-law way of necessity as a matter of law is established. Acquiring Access to Private Landlocked Tracts: Wyoming's Statutory Right-of-Way, Walton v. Dana, 609 P.2d 461,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1980), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Vacating a private road.

Official action by a board of county commissioners which establishes a private road pursuant to this chapter is necessary to vacate that same private road. Hulse v. First Am. Title Co., 2001 WY 95, 33 P.3d 122,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2001), reh'g denied,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. Nov. 20, 2001).

Foreclosure on servient estate extinguishes common-law way. —

A common-law way of necessity, created over lands subject to a mortgage, by the conveyance of unmortgaged, landlocked adjacent lands by the mortgagor, does not survive the foreclosure of the mortgage on the servient estate. To protect the interest of the mortgagee, upon foreclosure of a mortgage and after the redemption period, title to the mortgaged property vests in the purchaser at the foreclosure sale and relates back to the date of the mortgage, extinguishing intervening rights and claims. Bush v. Duff, 754 P.2d 159,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1988), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Powers of Board of County Commissioners. —

Where property owners sought temporary access over a landowners'
land pending eminent domain proceedings, a board of county commissioners had no authority to grant temporary access.
Voss v. Goodman, 2009 WY 40, 203 P.3d 415,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2009).

Authority of courts. —

Neither the board of county commissioners nor the district court is at liberty to graft onto this section that which it thinks ought to be included or to delete that which it finds inconvenient. Dunning v. Ankney, 936 P.2d 61,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1997).

Court could not award easement in lieu of common-law way of necessity,

conditioned upon compensation for the lands committed to the easement. Sections

24-9-101

through

24-9-103

grant the power and authority to establish a private road to the county commissioners. The court usurped the function of the executive department of government, the county commissioners, in contravention of the separation of powers mandated by art. 2, § 1, Wyo. Const.Bush v. Duff, 754 P.2d 159,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1988), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Pleadings. —

In action to establish way of necessity over defendant's lands, it cannot be assumed that plaintiff has no access to his lands from a public highway in absence of some allegation in the petition to that effect. McIlquham v. Anthony Wilkinson Live Stock Co., 18 Wyo. 53, 104 P. 20,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1909).

Allegation in action to establish ways of necessity over defendant's lands that plaintiff cannot reach either of the county roads mentioned in his petition without going through defendant's fences, is not equivalent to an allegation that he has no other means of access to a public highway from his lands. McIlquham v. Anthony Wilkinson Live Stock Co., 18 Wyo. 53, 104 P. 20,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1909).

Proceedings against United States. —

The law is well settled that waiver of sovereign immunity is to be strictly construed, and it is plain that congress did not give its consent to suits against it by private individuals seeking private roads. Dry Creek Lodge, Inc. v. United States, 515 F.2d 926, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 14757 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975), cert. denied, Shoshone Tribes v. Dry Creek Lodge, Inc., 449 U.S. 1118, 101 S. Ct. 931, 66 L. Ed. 2d 847, 1981 U.S. LEXIS 585 (U.S. 1981).

Proposed road to be described in application. —

This section requires that the application set out a description of the road it proposes, and that requirement is met where the application specifically sets forth several alternative roads. Gold v. Board of County Comm'rs, 658 P.2d 690,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1983).

Surveys of proposed roads. —

County had no authority to require landowners of landlocked property to conduct two surveys on proposed roads, and landowners were entitled to request reimbursement of costs incurred for preparation of the two needless surveys. Martens v. Johnson County Bd. of Comm'rs, 954 P.2d 375,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1998).

Amendment by board of county commissioners violated statutory mandate. —

In an action for condemnation of a private road, a board of county commissioners'
amendment of the viewers'
report violated a statutory mandate that the road be located so as to do the least possible damage to the land over which it was located; the board's extension of the road created additional damage to appellant's property, solely as a convenience to appellees.
Goodman v. Voss, 2011 WY 33, 248 P.3d 1120,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2011).

Notice. —

This section does not require that petitioner give notice to all landowners within subdivision who might be affected by proposed road due to increased traffic. Miller v. Bradley, 4 P.3d 882,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2000).

This section requires an applicant to give notice only to the persons who own or occupy the land over which the proposed road will pass. Dunning v. Ankney, 936 P.2d 61,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1997).

The board of county commissioners improperly construed the “good faith” language of McGuire v. McGuire, 608 P.2d 1278,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1980), as requiring an applicant to give notice to all adjoining landowners where the proposed road would pass over only some of the land. Dunning v. Ankney, 936 P.2d 61,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1997).

Notice to adjoining landowners. —

County had no authority to require landowners of landlocked property to send notice to adjoining landowners whose property would not be crossed by roads proposed in application. Martens v. Johnson County Bd. of Comm'rs, 954 P.2d 375,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1998).

Obligation to present objections to board. —

Appellant was not an aggrieved party to establishment of private road, where appellant received proper notice of all proceedings but took no part, and failed to show good cause for failure to participate; appeal was therefore dismissed. Peter Kiewit Sons' Co. v. Sheridan County Bd. of Comm'rs (In re Dunning), 982 P.2d 704,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1999).

This section does not require a landowner to condemn a right of way.

This section does not require a landowner to condemn a right of way across property over which he already has legally enforceable access or to join parties who had previously provided such access.
J & T Props., LLC v. Gallagher (In re Establishment of a Private Roadway to Real Prop.), 2011 WY 112, 256 P.3d 522,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2011).

Filing of plat. —

Failure to file a plat concurrently with a final report in an action seeking to establish a private road was not prejudicial error where a survey and topographical map were submitted, all parties were aware of the location of the road as selected by several viewers, and the measurements were the same in the plat when it was finally ordered.
Closs v. Schell, 2006 WY 95, 139 P.3d 435,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2006).

Viewers have ultimate power to locate road. —

The ultimate power to locate a road as proposed by owners of landlocked property rests with the viewers to be appointed by county commissioners. McGuire v. McGuire, 608 P.2d 1278,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1980).

Alternative routes. —

A landlocked property owner cannot be forced to choose a wholly illogical, uneconomic, and unproductive road. Dunning v. Ankney, 936 P.2d 61,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1997).

Viewers and appraisers were authorized to consider an alternate route for a private road even though the owner of the land upon which that route was located was not originally notified by the applicants seeking the establishment of a private road because the owner received the notice required and authorized by the statute; when the viewers and appraisers determined that the owner could be affected by an alternate route it received notice, and that notice was provided by the county clerk. Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P?ship, 2017 WY 59,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(May 17, 2017).

Choice of a route as a private road was not illogical, uneconomic, and unproductive because although the road was difficult to travel, given the alternative, it was logical, economic, and productive; witnesses provided evidence supporting the conclusion that the chosen road was more economic and productive than the alternative road. Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P?ship, 2017 WY 59,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(May 17, 2017).

Board of county
commissioners properly established a private road allowing landowners
to access their landlocked property over a neighboring property that
belonged to a storm-water collection facility because the board's
selection of one proposed route over the facility's property was
not
contrary to the overwhelming weight of the evidence as the board
reasonably
determined that the route was the most reasonable, convenient,
and
cost-effective option for both of the parties. Zowada v. Mullinax Concrete Serv. Co., 2014 WY 121, 335 P.3d 455,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2014).

No constitutional right to address viewers and appraisers. —

Where landowners' due process rights were satisfied by a hearing before the board of county commissioners under this section, the owners were not prejudiced merely because they were not afforded an opportunity to address the viewers and appraisers on the question of damages. Carney v. Board of County Comm'rs, 757 P.2d 556,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1988).

Route chosen need not be most convenient and reasonable route possible,

taking into account all possible routes, but it only need be a reasonable and convenient route. Carney v. Board of County Comm'rs, 757 P.2d 556,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1988); Dunning v. Ankney, 936 P.2d 61,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1997).

“Reasonable and convenient.” —

Evidence was not sufficient to support the board of county commissioners' determination that an applicant's selection of a route was based on what was reasonably convenient only to the applicant and not also to adjacent landowners. Dunning v. Ankney, 936 P.2d 61,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1997).

Viewers appropriately considered alternate routes for a road where a route proposed by two neighbors was more reasonable and convenient due to the expense and considerable obstacles; the route chosen by two owners was not practicable, notwithstanding the fact that it did not join up with another easement.
Closs v. Schell, 2006 WY 95, 139 P.3d 435,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2006).

In an action by appellees to establish a private road over land owned by a concrete company, a trial court properly overturned a decision by a board of county commissioners because there was not substantial evidence to support the board's conclusion that the route it selected was the most convenient and reasonable route; from appellees'
standpoint, it was all but confiscatory.
Mullinax Concrete Serv. Co. v. Zowada, 2010 WY 146, 243 P.3d 181,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2010).

Application properly approved. —

Board of county commissioners properly granted applicant a private road over adjacent property owner's land where the finding that the requested access was necessary was supported by substantial evidence, and the applicant demonstrated good faith in bringing the application, and properly awarded damages to the owner for the taking but not interest on the damages. Mayland v. Flitner, 2001 WY 69, 28 P.3d 838,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2001).

Where petitioner landowner had no legally enforceable access to a public road, the district court correctly interpreted this section as allowing the condemnation of a private road across respondent adjoining landowner's property even though it did not connect directly with a public road and properly refused to require petitioner to join the owners of land over which he already had easements.
J & T Props., LLC v. Gallagher (In re Establishment of a Private Roadway to Real Prop.), 2011 WY 112, 256 P.3d 522,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2011).

Evidence sufficient to establish road. —

Board of county commissioners decision that established a private road over certain landowners' property pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

24-9-101

, awarded the landowners' damages, and ordered that cattle guards be installed was affirmed where the decision was supported by substantial evidence. Elk Horn Ranch, Inc. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 167, 57 P.3d 1218,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 2002).

Substantial Evidence in Support of Board's Decision. —

In dispute between a ranchers and their neighbor over the use of a private road, where the dispute centered on which road should be used; a Board of County Commissioners did not err where its decision was supported by substantial evidence: the testimony of the viewers and appraiser, video tapes, and reported findings.
Crago v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2007 WY 158, 168 P.3d 845,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2007).

In an action by appellees to establish a private road over land owned by a concrete company, a trial court properly overturned a decision by a board of county commissioners because there was not substantial evidence to support the board's conclusion that the route it selected was the most convenient and reasonable route; from appellees'
standpoint, it was all but confiscatory.
Mullinax Concrete Serv. Co. v. Zowada, 2010 WY 146, 243 P.3d 181,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2010).

Conclusion of the board of county commissioners that one road was more reasonable and convenient than another road was supported by substantial evidence because the board considered the condition of the roads, the length of time the roads were open, the use of the property through which the roads passed, and which road would cause the least damage to property over that it passed in determining which road was the most reasonable and convenient. Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P?ship, 2017 WY 59,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(May 17, 2017).

Retroactive application improper. —

When making factual findings on remand as to a private road, a board of county commissioners could not retroactively apply amended versions of this section and certify the matter to the district court. Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

8-1-107

barred such application, although the amendments were procedural, because it would not prevent a manifest injustice; moreover, allowing the district court to exercise jurisdiction as the fact finding body when it previously had acted in an appellate capacity would lead to absurd results, and the previous remand instructions had not been directed to the district court.
Mullinax Concrete Serv. Co. v. Zowada, 2012 WY 55, 275 P.3d 474,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2012).

Damages. —

In assessing damages under this section, appraisers are to determine “before” and “after” value of only those lands over which private road crosses, not all surrounding lands affected by the proposed road. Miller v. Bradley, 4 P.3d 882,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2000).

Appellant corporation, which contested the establishment of a private road that the appellee partnership had sought, failed to establish that (1) it was prevented from offering evidence of the value of its property with improvements, (2) viewers and appraisers did not consider damage to the corporation's property as a whole, and (3) viewers and appraisers failed to use comparable property sales or market values in making their assessment. R.C.R., Inc. v. Deline, 2003 WY 62, 70 P.3d 214,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2003).

Private road was properly established under this section over two owners'
land because, even though the before and after values of the land was not stated, it was clear from the testimony of two viewers that these values were utilized.
Closs v. Schell, 2006 WY 95, 139 P.3d 435,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2006).

Board of County Commissioners did not err in determining the appropriateness of one private road over another in a dispute between ranchers and their landlocked neighbors; however, error did occur with respect to damages. The award was not a “before and after” award, and the award of damages had no apparent basis in the facts and circumstances of the case.
Crago v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2007 WY 158, 168 P.3d 845,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2007).

Because the district court condemned a private road along an existing roadway on respondent landowner's property, respondent was awarded damages; however, this section did not authorize assessment of the appraisal costs to respondent.
J & T Props., LLC v. Gallagher (In re Establishment of a Private Roadway to Real Prop.), 2011 WY 112, 256 P.3d 522,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2011).

Portions not includible in private road. —

In a private road proceeding under the pre-2000 version of the private road statute, concededly landlocked property owners' private road could not include a federal Bureau of Land Management road that was subject to many limitations and to review after 30 years, nor a neighbor's easement that would be revoked if the owners eventually subdivided their land. Neither of these grants of access constituted the type of incorporeal right appurtenant to the estate that was contemplated by the statute. Voss v. Albany County Comm'rs, 2003 WY 94, 74 P.3d 714,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in
